North Carolina statutes. Chapter 166. Civil Preparedness Agencies. [Repealed]
§§ 166-1 through 166-13.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1977, c. 848, s. 1.

Cross References.

For present provisions as to civil preparedness, see Chapter 166A.

Editor’s Note.

Section 166-4 was previously repealed by Session Laws 1975, c. 734, s. 8. Section 166-13 was previously repealed by Session Laws 1955, c. 79.